Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.100

Intimidating any administrator, teacher, classified employee, or student by threat of force or violence unlawful—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to intimidate by threat of force or violence any administrator, teacher, classified employee, or student of any common school who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2003 c 53 s 170; 1990 c 33 s 541; 1988 c 2 s 2; 1971 c 45 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.87.231.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.